Massachusetts, session 194th, S2468.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 88 of chapter 33 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in subsection (a) by striking out the words “An officer or
enlisted person of the Massachusetts organized militia” and inserting in place thereof the
following words:- “Members of the armed forces of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts and
Massachusetts organized militia”.
SECTION 2. Said section 88 subsection (a), as so appearing, is further amended by
striking out the words “a board” in line 4 and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
“The Death Gratuity Board (the “Board”)”.
SECTION 3. Said section 88 subsection (b), as so appearing, is further amended by
adding in place thereof the following:- “Members of the armed forces of the Commonwealth of
Massachusetts and Massachusetts organized militia who, while performing any duty lawfully
of 3

ordered under this chapter without willful neglect on the part of the person, dies, shall, receive
compensation as described by a Board appointed under section 90 for a determination of death
gratuity benefits as described in paragraph (c) below. The Board shall consider death or injury
arising from present or past qualified duty status on behalf of the Commonwealth of
Massachusetts or United States of America. Qualified Duty Status is defined as State Active
Duty and service pursuant to orders under Titles 10 and 32 of the US Code.
SECTION 4. Said section 88 subsection (b), as so appearing, is further amended by
striking out the letter “(b)” and inserting in place thereof the following:- “(c)”.
SECTION 5. Said section 88 updated subsection (c), as so appearing, is further amended
by striking out the following words:- “If the death of a member of the Massachusetts organized
militia results from injury, sickness or disease received while in the line of duty, pursuant to
orders under titles 10 and 32 of the United States Code or this chapter and the injury, sickness or
disease resulting in the death”, and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “If the death
results from injury, sickness, or disease received while in the line of duty, pursuant to orders”.
SECTION 6. Said section 88 subsection (c), as so appearing, is further amended by
striking out the letter “(c)” and inserting in place thereof the following:- “(d)”.
SECTION 7. Said section 88 updated subsection (d), as so appearing, is further amended
by striking out the letter “(b)” in line 15 and inserting in place thereof the following:- “(c)”.
SECTION 8. Said section 88 updated subsection (d), as so appearing, is further amended
by striking out the words “a member of the Massachusetts organized militia”, and inserting in
place thereof the following words:- “a member of the armed forces of the Commonwealth of
Massachusetts and / or Massachusetts organized militia”.
of 3

SECTION 9. Said section 88 subsection (d), as so appearing, is further amended by
striking out the letter “(d)” and inserting in place thereof the following:- “(e)”.
SECTION 10. Said section 88 subsection (e), as so appearing, is further amended by
striking out the letter “(e)” and inserting in place thereof the following:- “(f)”
SECTION 11. Said section 88, as so appearing, is further amended by adding the
following new subsection:- “(g) The board will make a recommendation to the adjudicative
authority (The Adjutant General)”.
of 3